West Virginia, session 2025, HB2420.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. POWERS AND DUTIES OF PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION. §24-2-1s. Redeployment of Existing Generating Plant Sites. (a) The Legislature finds and declares that:(1) Due to technological advances and increasing concerns nationally about reducing greenhouse gas emissions to address climate change, a major transition is underway in the electric utility industry;(2) This transition potentially threatens the continued operation of coal-fired generating plants, which could result in the closure of the facilities, the loss of jobs for power plant workers, and adverse impacts on the communities in which the plants are located;(3) Existing power plant sites may need to be redeployed using other technologies to maintain the use of the site and retain the jobs and economic benefits associated with continued generation of electricity at these sites;(4) West Virginia must act to stabilize its electricity rates to remain competitive in order to attract industrial and manufacturing facilities that will provide good-paying jobs;(5) In evaluating the possible redeployment of existing power plant sites, the public service commission shall engage in a rigorous analysis that takes into account the economic and environmental impacts of the competing proposals;(6) All available energy technologies, including nuclear energy, should be considered for inclusion within the scope of the economic and environmental analyses; and(7) If coal-fired generating plants are retired prior to the end of their useful lives, creative financing strategies should be used to minimize the impact of the closures on electric ratepayers and to provide funding to assist in the transition of power plant workers and the communities in which power plants are located.(b) The holder of a certificate of public convenience and necessity previously issued by the commission pursuant to §24-2-11 authorizing the construction of a generating plant may apply to the commission for approval to redeploy the site upon which the plant is located, or adjacent sites, through construction of a new generating plant.(c) In deciding whether to grant approval of the application, the commission shall consider:(1) The projected long-term energy costs (exclusive of any applicable state incentives) of other resource options for electricity generation proposed for the site including nuclear, natural gas, solar, wind, geothermal, other renewables, energy storage, and any combination thereof. In the case of nuclear facilities, long-term energy costs shall include the recovery in rates of decommissioning costs for the nuclear facility from ratepayers receiving power from the facility.(2) The environmental impacts of such other resource options including, where applicable, estimates of a future price on carbon, whether determined as the social cost of carbon or derived from operating carbon markets.(d) The commission shall promulgate rules setting forth the requirements for any additional information to be included in an application for redeployment of an existing generating plant site, or adjacent sites.